Utah statutes.
57-11-9.   Notice of filing of application for registration -- Division orders of registration or rejection.

(1) (a)  Upon receipt of the application for registration in proper form, the division shall issue a notice of filing to the applicant within five business days of the date of receipt of application.

(b)  Within 30 days from the date of the notice of filing, or, if no notice of filing is issued within the time required, within 35 days from the date of receipt of the application, the division shall register the subdivided lands or reject the registration.

(c)  If the division has not entered the rejection within 30 days from the date of notice of filing, the land is considered registered unless the applicant has consented in writing to a delay.

(2)  (a)  After inquiry and examination, if the division affirmatively determines that the requirements of Subsection 57-11-8(1) have been met, it shall register the subdivided lands and shall designate the form of the public offering statement.

(b)  The division may provide that the public offering statement is not effective until evidence is obtained and made part of the public offering statement that demonstrates that all permits or approvals necessary for the subdivided lands to be put to the use for which they are offered have been granted.

(3)  (a)  After inquiry and examination, if the division determines that any of the requirements of Subsection 57-11-8(1) have not been met, it shall notify the applicant that the application for registration, the promotional plan, or the plan of disposition must be corrected within 15 days or within the time allowed by the division.

(b)  If the requirements are not met within the time allowed, the division shall enter an order rejecting the registration, giving the reasons for the rejection.

(c)  Rejection of the registration is not effective for 20 days, during which time the applicant may request a hearing.



Amended by Chapter 161, 1987 General Session

